Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.132

Disposition of surplus property.

Every metropolitan park district may, by unanimous decision of its board of park commissioners, sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property acquired for park or recreational purposes when such property is declared surplus for park or other recreational purposes: PROVIDED, That where the property is acquired by donation or dedication for park or recreational purposes, the consent of the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns is first obtained if the consent of the donor is required in the instrument conveying the property to the metropolitan park district. In the event the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns cannot be located after a reasonable search, the metropolitan park district may petition the superior court in the county where the property is located for approval of the sale. If sold, all sales shall be by public bids and sale made only to the highest and best bidder.

[ 1989 c 319 s 4; (2005 c 4 s 1 expired December 31, 2006); 1965 c 7 s 35.61.132. Prior: 1959 c 93 s 1.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2005 c 4 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires December 31, 2006." [ 2005 c 4 s 2.]